test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-a_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:
  Noun - sollâ:
    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom:   sollâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen:   soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill:   soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc:   sooḷân
    sollâ+N+Sg+Com:   soolâst
    sollâ+N+Sg+Abe:   solláin
    sollâ+N+Ess:      soˊlâttáá
    sollâ+N+Pl+Nom:   sollân
    sollâ+N+Pl+Gen:   sollâd
    sollâ+N+Pl+Acc:   soolah
    sollâ+N+Pl+Ill:   soolâi  soˊlâi
    sollâ+N+Pl+Loc:   soolâid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Com:   solláid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe:   soolâin

  Noun - roppâ:
    roppâ+N+Sg+Nom:   roppâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Gen:   roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Ill:   roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Loc:   roopân
    roppâ+N+Sg+Com:   roopâst
    roppâ+N+Sg+Abe:   roppáin
    roppâ+N+Ess:      roˊpâttáá
    roppâ+N+Pl+Nom:   roppân
    roppâ+N+Pl+Gen:   roppâd
    roppâ+N+Pl+Acc:   roopah
    roppâ+N+Pl+Ill:   roopâi roˊpâi
    roppâ+N+Pl+Loc:   roopâid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Com:   roppáid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Abe:   roopâin

  Noun - puddâ:
    puddâ+N+Sg+Nom:   puddâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Gen:   puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Ill:   puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Loc:   puudân
    puddâ+N+Sg+Com:   puudâst
    puddâ+N+Sg+Abe:   puddáin
    puddâ+N+Ess:      puˊdâttáá
    puddâ+N+Pl+Nom:   puddân
    puddâ+N+Pl+Gen:   puddâd
    puddâ+N+Pl+Acc:   puudah
    puddâ+N+Pl+Ill:   puudâi puˊdâi
    puddâ+N+Pl+Loc:   puudâid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Com:   puddáid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Abe:   puudâin

  Noun - rippâ:
    rippâ+N+Sg+Nom:   rippâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Gen:   riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Ill:   riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Loc:   riipân
    rippâ+N+Sg+Com:   riipâst
    rippâ+N+Sg+Abe:   rippáin
    rippâ+N+Ess:      riˊpâttáá
    rippâ+N+Pl+Nom:   rippân
    rippâ+N+Pl+Gen:   rippâd
    rippâ+N+Pl+Acc:   riipah
    rippâ+N+Pl+Ill:   riipâi riˊpâi
    rippâ+N+Pl+Loc:   riipâid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Com:   rippáid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Abe:   riipâin

  Noun - skammâ:
    skammâ+N+Sg+Nom:   skammâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Gen:   skaaṃâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Ill:   skaamâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Loc:   skaaṃân
    skammâ+N+Sg+Com:   skaaṃâst
    skammâ+N+Sg+Abe:   skammáin
    skammâ+N+Ess:      skaˊmâttáá
    skammâ+N+Pl+Nom:   skammân
    skammâ+N+Pl+Gen:   skammâd
    skammâ+N+Pl+Acc:   skaaṃah
    skammâ+N+Pl+Ill:   skaaṃâi skaˊmâi
    skammâ+N+Pl+Loc:   skaamâid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Com:   skammáid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Abe:   skaamâin

  Noun - lekkâ:
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Nom:   lekkâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Gen:   leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Ill:   leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Loc:   leekân
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Com:   leehâst
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Abe:   lehháin
    lekkâ+N+Ess:      leˊhâttáá
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Nom:   lekkân
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Gen:   lekkâd
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Acc:   leehah
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Ill:   leehâi leˊhâi
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Loc:   leehâid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Com:   lehháid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Abe:   leehâin

  Noun - kussâ:
    kussâ+N+Sg+Nom:   kussâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Gen:   kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Ill:   kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Loc:   kuusân
    kussâ+N+Sg+Com:   kuusâst
    kussâ+N+Sg+Abe:   kussáin
    kussâ+N+Ess:      kuˊsâttáá
    kussâ+N+Pl+Nom:   kussân
    kussâ+N+Pl+Gen:   kussâd
    kussâ+N+Pl+Acc:   kuusah
    kussâ+N+Pl+Ill:   kuusâi kuˊsâi
    kussâ+N+Pl+Loc:   kuusâid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Com:   kussáid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Abe:   kuusâin

  Noun - kielâ:
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom:   kieḷâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen:   kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill:   kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc:   kieḷân
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com:   kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe:   kieláin
    kielâ+N+Ess:      kieˊlâttáá
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom:   kiellân
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen:   kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc:   kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill:   kielâi kielâi 
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc:   kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com:   kieláid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe:   kielâin

  Noun - njuolâ:
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Nom:   njuoḷâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Gen:   njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Ill:   njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Loc:   njuoḷân
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Com:   njuolâst
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Abe:   njuoláin
    njuolâ+N+Ess:      njuoˊlâttáá
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Nom:   njuollân
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Gen:   njuollâd
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Acc:   njuolah
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Ill:   njuolâi / njuolâi
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Loc:   njuolâid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Com:   njuoláid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Abe:   njuolâin

  Noun - moolâ:
    moolâ+N+Sg+Nom:   mooḷâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Gen:   moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Ill:   moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Loc:   mooḷân
    moolâ+N+Sg+Com:   moolâst
    moolâ+N+Sg+Abe:   mooláin
    moolâ+N+Ess:      moˊlâttáá
    moolâ+N+Pl+Nom:   moollân
    moolâ+N+Pl+Gen:   moollâd
    moolâ+N+Pl+Acc:   moolah
    moolâ+N+Pl+Ill:   moolâi moˊlâi
    moolâ+N+Pl+Loc:   moolâid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Com:   mooláid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Abe:   moolâin

  Noun - algâ:
    algâ+N+Sg+Nom:   alˊgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Gen:   aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Ill:   aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Loc:   aalgân
    algâ+N+Sg+Com:   aalgâst
    algâ+N+Sg+Abe:   alˊgáin
    algâ+N+Ess:      aˊlgâttáá
    algâ+N+Pl+Nom:   alˊgân
    algâ+N+Pl+Gen:   algâd
    algâ+N+Pl+Acc:   aalgah
    algâ+N+Pl+Ill:   aalgâi aˊlgâi
    algâ+N+Pl+Loc:   aalgâid
    algâ+N+Pl+Com:   alˊgáid
    algâ+N+Pl+Abe:   aalgâin

  Noun - ristâ:
    ristâ+N+Sg+Nom:   risˊtâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Gen:   riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Ill:   riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Loc:   riistân
    ristâ+N+Sg+Com:   riistâst
    ristâ+N+Sg+Abe:   risˊtáin
    ristâ+N+Ess:      riˊstâttáá
    ristâ+N+Pl+Nom:   risˊtân
    ristâ+N+Pl+Gen:   ristâd
    ristâ+N+Pl+Acc:   riistah
    ristâ+N+Pl+Ill:   riistâi riˊstâi
    ristâ+N+Pl+Loc:   riistâid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Com:   risˊtáid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Abe:   riistâin

  Noun - kolbâ:
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Nom:   kolˊbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Gen:   koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Ill:   koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Loc:   koolbân
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Com:   koolbâst
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Abe:   kolˊbáin
    kolbâ+N+Ess:      koˊlbâttáá
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Nom:   kolˊbân
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Gen:   kolbâd
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Acc:   koolbah
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Ill:   koolbâi koˊlbâi
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Loc:   koolbâid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Com:   kolˊbáid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Abe:   koolbâin

  Noun - muršâ:
    muršâ+N+Sg+Nom:   murˊšâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Gen:   muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Ill:   muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Loc:   muuršân
    muršâ+N+Sg+Com:   muuršâst
    muršâ+N+Sg+Abe:   murˊšáin
    muršâ+N+Ess:      muˊršâttáá
    muršâ+N+Pl+Nom:   murˊšân
    muršâ+N+Pl+Gen:   muršâd
    muršâ+N+Pl+Acc:   muuršah
    muršâ+N+Pl+Ill:   muuršâi muˊršâi
    muršâ+N+Pl+Loc:   muuršâid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Com:   murˊšáid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Abe:   muuršâin

  Noun - rytmâ:
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Nom:   rytˊmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Gen:   ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Ill:   ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Loc:   ryytmân
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Com:   ryytmâst
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Abe:   rytˊmáin
    rytmâ+N+Ess:      ryˊtmâttáá
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Nom:   rytˊmân
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Gen:   rytmâd
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Acc:   ryytmah
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Ill:   ryytmâi ryˊtmâi
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Loc:   ryytmâid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Com:   rytˊmáid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Abe:   ryytmâin

  Noun - nieidâ:
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Nom:   nieiˊdâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Gen:   nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Ill:   nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Loc:   nieidân
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Com:   nieidâst
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Abe:   nieiˊdáin
    nieidâ+N+Ess:      niEidâttáá
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Nom:   nieiˊdân
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Gen:   nieiˊdâd
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Acc:   nieidah
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Ill:   nieidâi niEidâi
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Loc:   nieidâid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Com:   nieiˊdáid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Abe:   nieidâin

  Noun - ruoidâ:
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Nom:   ruoiˊdâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Gen:   ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Ill:   ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Loc:   ruoidân
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Com:   ruoidâst
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Abe:   ruoiˊdáin
    ruoidâ+N+Ess:      ruOidâttáá
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Nom:   ruoiˊdân
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Gen:   ruoiˊdâd
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Acc:   ruoidah
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Ill:   ruoidâi ruOidâi
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Loc:   ruoidâid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Com:   ruoiˊdáid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Abe:   ruoidâin

  Noun - njuhčâ:
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Nom:   njuhčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Gen:   njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Ill:   njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Loc:   njuuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Com:   njuuvčâst
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Abe:   njuvččáin
    njuhčâ+N+Ess:      njuˊvčâttáá
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Nom:   njuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Gen:   njukčâd
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Acc:   njuuvčah
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Ill:   njuuvčâi njuˊvčâi
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Loc:   njuuvčâid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Com:   njuvˊččáid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Abe:   njuuvčâin

  Noun - kiksâ:
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Nom:   kikˊsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Gen:   kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Ill:   kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Loc:   kiiksân
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Com:   kiivsâst
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Abe:   kivˊssáin
    kiksâ+N+Ess:      kiˊvsâttáá
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Nom:   kikˊsân
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Gen:   kiskâd
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Acc:   kiivsah
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Ill:   kiivsâi kiˊvsâi
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Loc:   kiivsâid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Com:   kivˊssáid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Abe:   kiivsâin

  Noun - vahtâ:
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Nom:   vahˊtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Gen:   vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Ill:   vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Loc:   vaahtân
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Com:   vaavtâst
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Abe:   vavˊttáin
    vahtâ+N+Ess:      vaˊvtâttáá
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Nom:   vahˊtân
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Gen:   vahtâd
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Acc:   vaavtah
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Ill:   vaavtâi vaˊvtâi
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Loc:   vaavtâid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Com:   vavˊttáid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Abe:   vaavtâin

  Noun - lahcâ:
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Nom:   lahˊcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Gen:   laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Ill:   laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Loc:   laahcân
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Com:   laavcâst
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Abe:   lavˊccáin
    lahcâ+N+Ess:      laˊvcâttáá
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Nom:   lahˊcân
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Gen:   lahcâd
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Acc:   laavcah
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Ill:   laavcâi laˊvcâi
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Loc:   laavcâid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Com:   lavˊccáid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Abe:   laavcâin

  Noun - tekstâ:
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Nom:   tekstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Gen:   teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Ill:   teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Loc:   teekstân
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Com:   teevstâst
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Abe:   tevˊsttáin
    tekstâ+N+Ess:      teˊvstâttáá
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Nom:   tekstân
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Gen:   tekstâd
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Acc:   teevstah
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Ill:   teevstâi teˊvstâi
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Loc:   teevstâid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Com:   tevˊsttáid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Abe:   teevstâin

  Noun - luččâ:
    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom:   luččâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen:   luuj̣â
    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill:   luuj̣â
    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc:   luučân
    luččâ+N+Sg+Com:   luuj̣âst
    luččâ+N+Sg+Abe:   luuj̣áin
    luččâ+N+Ess:      luˊjâttáá
    luččâ+N+Pl+Nom:   luččân
    luččâ+N+Pl+Gen:   luččâd
    luččâ+N+Pl+Acc:   luuj̣ah
    luččâ+N+Pl+Ill:   luuj̣âi luˊjâi
    luččâ+N+Pl+Loc:   luuj̣âid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Com:   luijáid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe:   luijáin

  Noun - kurkkâ:
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Nom:   kurˊkkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Gen:   kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Ill:   kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Loc:   kuurkân
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Com:   kuurkâst
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Abe:   kurˊkkáin
    kurkkâ+N+Ess:      kuˊrkâttáá
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Nom:   kurkkân
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Gen:   kurkkâd
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Acc:   kuurkah
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Ill:   kuurkâi kuˊrkâi
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Loc:   kuurkâid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Com:   kurkkáid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Abe:   kuurkâin

  Noun - mirkkâ:
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Nom:   mirˊkkâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Gen:   miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Ill:   miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Loc:   miirkân
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Com:   miirhâst
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Abe:   mirˊháin
    mirkkâ+N+Ess:      miˊrhâttáá
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Nom:   mirˊkkân
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Gen:   mirkkâd
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Acc:   miirhah
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Ill:   miirhâi miˊrhâi
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Loc:   miirhâid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Com:   mirˊháid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Abe:   miirhâin

  Noun - merkkâ:
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Nom:   merˊkkâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Gen:   meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Ill:   meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Loc:   meerkân
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Com:   meerhâst
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Abe:   merˊháin
    merkkâ+N+Ess:      meˊrhâttáá
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Nom:   merˊkkân
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Gen:   merkkâd
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Acc:   meerhah
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Ill:   meerhâi meˊrhâi
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Loc:   meerhâid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Com:   merˊháid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Abe:   meerhâin
